src-fst-morphology-root.lexc.md
* @U.TAM-HAB.ZERO@  
* @U.TAM-HAB.IRR@	  ɬu%< also FUT
* @R.TAM-HAB.IRR@	  ɬu%< also FUT
* @U.TAM-HAB.HAB@	  ƛ̕u%<
* @R.TAM-HAB.HAB@	  ƛ̕u%<

* @U.TAM-RE.ZERO@   
* @U.TAM-RE.RE@   bə Anew, re-
* @R.TAM-RE.RE@   bə

* @U.NMZ.ZERO@  
* @U.NMZ.V2N@   s%^√
* @R.NMZ.V2N@   s%^√
* @U.NMZ.V2A@   dəxʷ
* @R.NMZ.V2A@   dəxʷ

* @U.TAM-T.ZERO@	  
* @U.TAM-T.REM@	  tu%<
* @R.TAM-T.REM@	  tu%<

* @U.TAM-A.ZERO@	  none of these
* @D.TAM-A@	  ʔu%<
* @U.TAM-A.PFV@	  ʔu%<
* @R.TAM-A.PFV@	  ʔu%<
* @U.TAM-A.CONT@	  ləcu%<
* @R.TAM-A.CONT@	  ləcu%<
* @U.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@  ləs%<
* @R.TAM-A.PROGSTAT@  ləs%<
* @U.TAM-A.PROG@	  progressive lə%<
* @R.TAM-A.PROG@	  progressive lə%<
* @U.TAM-A.STAT@  ʔəs%<
* @R.TAM-A.STAT@  ʔəs%<
* @U.TAM.NO@  What is this? 2025-07-18
* @R.TAM.NO@  

* @U.OBJ.ZERO@     
* @U.OBJ.1@        
* @U.OBJ.2@        
* @U.OBJ.3@        

* @U.OBJ.SG1@	  
* @U.OBJ.SG2@	  
* @U.OBJ.PL1@	  
* @U.OBJ.PL2@	  
* @U.OBJ.SP3@	  
* @U.OBJ.ZERO@	  
* @U.OBJ.MID@	  

* @D.OBJ.SG1@	  
* @D.OBJ.SG2@	  
* @D.OBJ.PL1@	  
* @D.OBJ.PL2@	  
* @D.OBJ.SP3@	  
* @D.OBJ.MID@	  
* @D.OBJ@	  

* @R.TAM@		  
* @D.TAM@		  
* @C.TAM@		  

* **LEXICON Root ** Root lexicon
The word forms in LUSHOOTSEED language start from the lexeme roots of basic
word classes, or optionally from prefixes:

*    Adpositions  ;  
*    Adverbs  ;	    
*    Conjunctors  ;	    
*    Interjections  ;	    
*    Pronouns    ;   
*    Numerals    ;   
*    Prefixes    ;    Feeds Adjectives, Nouns, Propernouns, Verbs

* **LEXICON K ** Clitic lexicon

* **LEXICON ENDLEX **

* * *

<small>This (part of) documentation was generated from [src/fst/morphology/root.lexc](https://github.com/giellalt/lang-lut/blob/main/src/fst/morphology/root.lexc)</small>
